Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-747
District; resolution; improvements authorized.

Upon compliance with the provisions of sections 31-744 to 31-746, the board of trustees or the administrator may by resolution order the making, reconstruction, purchase, or otherwise acquiring of any of the improvements provided for in sections 31-727 to 31-762.

Laws 1949, c. 78, § 21, p. 203;

Laws 1982, LB 868, § 15.